Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 3. Licenses

§ 3405.
Licenses.

To be eligible for licensure as an acupuncturist, an applicant shall be at least 18 years of age and shall furnish satisfactory proof that he or she:

holds a degree or diploma from an educational institution accredited by the Accreditation Commission for Acupuncture and Oriental Medicine or a substantially equivalent or successor accrediting organization approved by the U.S. Department of Education and the Director, which shall include at least two academic years and a minimum of 400 hours of supervised clinical practice; and

passed the examination described in section 3406 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1997, No. 40

, § 49(b);

2005, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 40;

2007, No. 29

, § 55;

2017, No. 48

, § 27;

2019, No. 30

, § 23.

§ 3406.
Examination.

The Director shall examine applicants for licensure and may use a standardized national examination. The examination shall include the following subjects:

Anatomy and physiology.

Acupuncture pathology.

Acupuncture diagnosis.

Hygiene, sanitation, and sterilization techniques.

The principles, practices, and techniques of acupuncture.

Clean needle techniques.

[Repealed.]

The Director may adopt rules necessary to perform his or her duties under this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1997, No. 40

, § 49(b);

2005, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 41;

2019, No. 30

, § 23;

2021, No. 69

, § 6.

§ 3407.
Licensure without examination.

The Director may waive the examination requirement under subdivision 3405(2) of this chapter if the applicant is an acupuncturist regulated under the laws of another state who is in good standing to practice acupuncture in that state and, in the opinion of the Director, the standards and qualifications required for regulation of acupuncturists in that state are substantially equivalent to those required by this chapter.

The Director may waive the examination requirement under subdivision 3405(2) of this chapter for an applicant who has furnished evidence of having passed the examination administered by the National Certification Commission for Acupuncture and Oriental Medicine.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1997, No. 40

, § 49(b);

2007, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 33;

2019, No. 30

, § 23.

§ 3407a.
Repealed. 1997, No. 40, § 43.

§ 3408.
Renewals.

Licenses shall be renewed every two years upon payment of the required fee and furnishing satisfactory evidence of having completed 30 hours of continuing education credit during the preceding two years. The Director may adopt rules for the approval of continuing education programs and the awarding of credit.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1997, No. 40

, § 40;

2019, No. 30

, § 23.

§ 3409.
Repealed. 1997, No. 59, § 65(8), eff. June 30, 1997.

§ 3410.
Repealed. 2019, No. 30, § 23.

§ 3411.
Disclosure information.

The Director shall adopt rules requiring licensed acupuncturists to disclose to each new client before the first treatment the acupuncturist’s professional qualifications and experience, those actions that constitute unprofessional conduct, the method for filing a complaint or making a consumer inquiry, and provisions relating to the manner in which the information shall be displayed and signed by both the acupuncturist and the client.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1997, No. 40

, § 42.

§ 3412.
Repealed. 2019, No. 30, § 23.